Utah statutes.
30-3-15.1.   Appointment of domestic relations counselors, family court commissioner, and assistants and clerks.

In each county having a population of less than 300,000 and in which the district court has established a family court division the district court judge or judges may, and in each county having a population of more than 300,000 and in which the district court has established a family court division the district court judges shall, by an order filed in the office of the clerk on or before July 1 of each year, appoint one or more domestic relations counselors, an attorney of recognized ability and standing at the bar as family court commissioner, and such other persons as assistants and clerks as may be necessary, to serve during the pleasure of the appointing power.



Enacted by Chapter 72, 1969 General Session

